Utah statutes.
4-20-1.5.   State Grazing Advisory Board -- Duties.
(1) (a)  There is created within the department the State Grazing Advisory
Board.
(b)  The commissioner shall appoint the following members:
(i)  one member from each regional board;
(ii)  one member from the Conservation Commission created in Section 4-18-4;
(iii)  one representative of the Department of Natural Resources;
(iv)  two livestock producers at-large; and
(v)  one representative of the oil, gas, or mining industry.
(2)  The term of office for a state board member is four years.
(3)  Members of the state board shall elect a chair, who shall serve for two
years.
(4) (a) (i)  A member who is not a government employee may not receive
compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem
and expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties at
the rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  A member may decline to receive per diem and expenses for the member's
service.
(b) (i)  A state government officer and employee member who does not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from the agency the member represents for the
member's service may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance
of the member's official duties at the rates established by the Division of
Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  A state government officer and employee member may decline to receive
per diem and expenses for the member's service.
(c) (i)  A local government member who does not receive salary, per diem, or
expenses from the entity that the member represents for the member's service
may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of the member's
official duties at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  A local government member may decline to receive per diem and expenses
for the member's service.
(5)  The state board shall:
(a)  receive:
(i)   advice and recommendations from a regional board concerning:
(A)  management plans for public lands, state lands, and school and
institutional trust lands as defined in Section 53C-1-103, within the regional
board's region; and
(B)  any issue that impacts grazing on private lands, public lands, state
lands, or school and institutional trust lands as defined in Section
53C-1-103, in its region; and
(ii)  requests for fund monies from the entities described in Subsections
(5)(c)(i) through (iv);
(b)  recommend state policy positions and cooperative agency participation in
federal and state land management plans to the department and to the Public
Lands Policy Coordinating Office created under Section 63J-4-602; and
(c)  advise the department on the requests and recommendations of:
(i)  regional boards;
(ii)  county weed control boards created under Section 4-17-4;
(iii)  cooperative weed management associations; and
(iv)  conservation districts created under the authority of Title 17D, Chapter
3, Conservation District Act.
